en: Projection & Tripod Skirts
xx: Projection & Tripod Skirts
cs: Závěsy na skrytí stojanů
da: Projektor- og trefodslærred
de: Rockvorhänge für Leinwände
es: Cortinas para pantallas de proyección y trípodes
fr: Jupes de projection
it: Teli per proiezioni e treppiedi
ja: スクリーン・三脚用スカート
nl: Projectie- en statiefhoezen
no: Prosjektør- og stativskjørt
pl: Osłony do projektorów i statywów
pt: Saias de projeção e tripés
ru: Юбки для штативов и проекционных стоек
sv: Draperier för projektorer och stativ
tr: Projeksiyon Cihazı ve Tripod Etekleri

en: Projection Screen Stands
xx: Projection Screen Stands
cs: Stojany na projekční plátna
da: Projektionslærred – standere
de: Ständer für Projektionsflächen
es: Soportes para pantallas de proyección
fr: Supports pour écrans de projection
it: Supporti schermi proiezione
ja: プロジェクター用スクリーンスタンド
nl: Standaarden voor projectieschermen
no: Stativer til prosjeksjonslerret
pl: Stojaki do ekranów projekcyjnych
pt: Suportes para tela de projeção
ru: Стойки для проекционных экранов
sv: Stativ för projektordukar
tr: Projeksiyon Perdesi Ayakları

en: Projection Screens
xx: Projection Screens
cs: Projekční plátna
da: Projektionslærreder
de: Projektionsleinwände
es: Pantallas para proyección
fr: Écrans de projection
it: Schermi di proiezione
ja: プロジェクター用スクリーン
nl: Projectieschermen
no: Prosjeksjonslerreter
pl: Ekrany projekcyjne
pt: Telas de projeção
ru: Проекционные экраны
sv: Projektordukar
tr: Projeksiyon Perdeleri

en: Projector Mounts
xx: Projector Mounts
cs: Držáky projektorů
da: Projektor – beslag
de: Projektorhalterungen
es: Soportes para proyectores
fr: Supports pour projecteur
it: Supporti per proiettore
ja: プロジェクター取付金具
nl: Projectorsteunen
no: Prosjektørstativer
pl: Uchwyty do projektorów
pt: Suportes para projetores
ru: Крепления для проекторов
sv: Projektorfästen
tr: Projeksiyon Cihazı Montaj Kitleri

en: Projector Replacement Lamps
xx: Projector Replacement Lamps
cs: Náhradní lampy do projektorů
da: Projektor – pærer
de: Projektorersatzleuchten
es: Lámparas de repuesto para proyectores
fr: Lampes de rechange pour projecteurs
it: Lampade ricambio proiettori
ja: プロジェクター用交換ランプ
nl: Vervangende lampen voor projectoren
no: Reservelamper til prosjektører
pl: Wymienne lampy do projektorów
pt: Lâmpadas de reposição para projetor
ru: Сменные лампы для проекторов
sv: Ersättningslampor till projektorer
tr: Projeksiyon Cihazı Yedek Lambaları

en: Rewinders
xx: Rewinders
cs: Převíječe
da: Tilbagespolere
de: Spulgeräte
es: Rebobinadores
fr: Appareils de rembobinage
it: Riavvolgitori
ja: リワインダー
nl: Terugspoelapparaten
no: Tilbakespolere
pl: Przewijacze
pt: Rebobinadores
ru: Устройства перемотки
sv: Tillbakaspolare
tr: Geri Sarma Makineleri

en: Television Parts & Accessories
xx: Television Parts & Accessories
cs: Díly a příslušenství k televizorům
da: TV – reservedele og tilbehør
de: TV-Zubehör
es: Accesorios y piezas para televisores
fr: Accessoires et pièces pour téléviseurs
it: Accessori e componenti per TV
ja: テレビパーツ・関連用品
nl: Televisieonderdelen en -accessoires
no: Deler og tilbehør til TV
pl: Akcesoria i części do telewizorów
pt: Acessórios e peças para televisão
ru: Детали и принадлежности для телевизоров
sv: Tv-tillbehör
tr: Televizyon Parçaları ve Aksesuarları

en: TV & Monitor Mounts
xx: TV & Monitor Mounts
cs: Držáky na televize a monitory
da: Tv- og skærmbeslag
de: TV- & Monitorhalterungen
es: Soportes para monitores y televisor
fr: Supports pour téléviseurs et écrans, Réhausse TV
it: Supporti TV
ja: テレビ・モニター用取付金具
nl: Tv-steunen
no: TV- og skjermfester
pl: Uchwyty do telewizorów i monitorów
pt: Suportes para televisão e monitor
ru: Крепления для телевизоров и мониторов
sv: Fästen för TV och skärmar
tr: Televizyon ve Monitör Montaj Kitleri

en: TV Converter Boxes
xx: TV Converter Boxes
cs: Set-top boxy
da: Modtagerbokse
de: TV-Konverter & Receiver
es: Decodificadores para TV
fr: Adaptateurs TV
it: Decoder TV
ja: TVスキャンコンバーター
nl: Tv-scanomvormers
no: TV-mottakerbokser
pl: Konwertery telewizyjne
pt: Conversores scan para TV
ru: Телевизионные приставки
sv: Tv-konverteringsboxar
tr: Televizyon Tarama Çeviricileri

en: TV Replacement Lamps
xx: TV Replacement Lamps
cs: Náhradní lampy do projekčních televizorů
da: Tv-pærer
de: Ersatzlampen für Fernseher
es: Lámparas de repuesto para el televisor
fr: Lampes de rechange pour télévision
it: Lampade ricambio televisori
ja: 交換用TV内蔵ランプ
nl: Vervangende lampen voor televisies
no: Reservelamper til TV
pl: Wymienne lampy do telewizorów
pt: Lâmpadas de reposição para televisão
ru: Сменные лампы для телевизоров
sv: Ersättningslampor till TV-apparater
tr: Televizyon Yedek Lambaları

en: TV Replacement Speakers
xx: TV Replacement Speakers
cs: Náhradní reproduktory k televizím
da: Integrerbare højttalere til fjernsyn
de: TV-Lautsprecher
es: Altavoces de repuesto para TV
fr: Enceintes TV
it: Altoparlanti sostitutivi per televisori
ja: 交換用TV内蔵スピーカー
nl: Vervangende luidsprekers voor televisies
no: Integrerbare TV-høyttalere
pl: Wymienne głośniki do telewizorów
pt: Alto-falantes de reposição para televisão
ru: Запасные динамики для телевизоров
sv: Ersättningshögtalare för TV-apparater
tr: TV Yedek Hoparlörleri

en: Video Editing Hardware & Production Equipment
xx: Video Editing Hardware & Production Equipment
cs: Vybavení pro střih a produkci videa
da: Videoredigering – hardware og produktion
de: Videobearbeitungshardware & Videoproduktionsausrüstung
es: Equipo de producción y hardware de edición de vídeo
fr: Matériel de montage et de production vidéo
it: Apparecchi montaggio video e produzione
ja: 映像編集・制作機器
nl: Hardware voor videobewerking en productieapparatuur
no: Maskinvare til videoredigering og produksjonsutstyr
pl: Sprzęt do edycji i produkcji filmów
pt: Hardware de edição e equipamentos de produção de vídeo
ru: Аппаратура и производственное оборудование для редактирования видеоизображений
sv: Maskinvara för videoredigering och produktionsutrustning
tr: Video Montaj Donanımı ve Prodüksiyon Ekipmanları

en: Video Multiplexers
xx: Video Multiplexers
cs: Multiplexory videa
da: Video – multipleksere
de: Video-Multiplexer
es: Multiplexores de vídeo
fr: Multiplexeurs vidéo
it: Multiplexer video
ja: ビデオマルチプレクサ
nl: Videomultiplexers
no: Videomultipleksere
pl: Multipleksery wideo
pt: Multiplexadores de vídeo
ru: Видеомультиплексоры
sv: Videomultiplexer
tr: Video Çoklayıcılar

en: Video Players & Recorders
xx: Video Players & Recorders
cs: Videopřehrávače a rekordéry
da: Videoafspillere og -optagere
de: Videoabspielgeräte & -rekorder
es: Grabadores y reproductores de vídeo
fr: Lecteurs et enregistreurs vidéo
it: Videoriproduttori/registratori
ja: 録画・再生機器
nl: Videospelers en -recorders
no: Videospillere og -opptakere
pl: Odtwarzacze i nagrywarki wideo
pt: Gravadores e players de vídeo
ru: Видеоплееры и рекордеры
sv: Videospelare och videoinspelningsutrustning
tr: Video Oynatıcılar ve Kaydediciler

en: DVD & Blu-ray Players
xx: DVD & Blu-ray Players
cs: Přehrávače DVD
da: Dvd- og Blu-Ray-afspillere
de: DVD- & Blu-ray-Player
es: Reproductores DVD y Blu-ray
fr: Lecteurs DVD et Blu-ray, Lecteur DVD
it: Lettori DVD e Blu-ray
ja: DVD・ブルーレイプレーヤー
nl: Dvd-spelers en blu ray-spelers
no: DVD- og Blu-ray-spillere
pl: Odtwarzacze DVD i Blu-ray
pt: Reprodutores de DVD e Blu-Ray
ru: DVD-плееры
sv: DVD- och Blu-ray-spelare
tr: DVD ve Blu-ray Oynatıcılar

en: DVD Recorders
xx: DVD Recorders
cs: Rekordéry DVD
da: Dvd-optagere
de: DVD-Rekorder
es: Grabadores DVD
fr: Enregistreurs DVD
it: Registratori DVD
ja: DVDレコーダー
nl: Dvd-recorders
no: DVD-opptakere
pl: Nagrywarki DVD
pt: Gravadores de DVD
ru: Рекордеры DVD
sv: DVD-spelare med inspelningsfunktion
tr: DVD Kaydediciler

en: Digital Video Recorders
xx: Digital Video Recorders
cs: Rekordéry digitálního videa
da: Digitale videooptagere
de: Digitale Videorekorder
es: Grabadores de vídeo digitales
fr: Enregistreurs vidéonumériques
it: Registratori video digitali
ja: デジタルビデオレコーダー
nl: Digitale videorecorders
no: Digitale videoopptakere
pl: Rejestratory cyfrowe DVR
pt: Gravadores de vídeo digitais
ru: Цифровые видеорекордеры
sv: Digitalvideoinspelare
tr: Dijital Video Kaydediciler

en: Streaming & Home Media Players
xx: Streaming & Home Media Players
cs: Streamování a domácí přehrávače médií
da: Hjemmebiografafspillere
de: Netzwerk-Mediaplayer
es: Reproductores multimedia domésticos y de streaming
fr: Lecteurs multimédia streaming
it: Lettori multimediali e di streaming
ja: メディアストリーミング端末
nl: Streaming en home-mediaspelers
no: Strømming og hjemmemediespillere
pl: Domowe centra multimedialne
pt: Reprodutores multimídia e dispositivos de streaming
ru: Сетевые медиаплееры
sv: Mediaspelare för hemmet
tr: Akış ve Ev Medya Oynatıcıları

en: VCRs
xx: VCRs
cs: Videorekordéry
da: Videobåndoptagere
de: Videorekorder
es: Videograbadoras
fr: Magnétoscopes, Magnétoscope
it: VCR
ja: ビデオデッキ
nl: Videorecorders
no: Videospillere
pl: Odtwarzacze wideo
pt: VRS
ru: Видеомагнитофоны
sv: Videobandspelare
tr: Video Kaset Kaydediciler

en: Video Servers
xx: Video Servers
cs: Videoservery
da: Videoservere
de: Videoserver
es: Servidores de vídeo
fr: Serveurs vidéo
it: Server video
ja: ビデオサーバー
nl: Videoservers
no: Videoservere
pl: Serwery wideo
pt: Servidores de vídeo
ru: Видеосерверы
sv: Videoservrar
tr: Video Sunucuları